Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 14.1 Technology-Related Assistance for Individuals with Disabilities Program

40-14.1-1.
Authority to establish program — Administration.

The department of human services is hereby authorized to establish a technology-related assistance for individuals with disabilities program. The department of human services shall be responsible for the administration of the program but may contract with other state agencies or nonprofit organizations in connection with the program. The director shall promulgate rules and regulations concerning eligibility and such other matters as are necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter. This program shall be administered in a manner to supplement but not supplant other existing programs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 417, § 1.

40-14.1-2.
Assistive technology services.

Services that may be provided eligible persons if not available from other sources include assistive technology services and devices. For the purposes of this chapter, “assistive technology services” shall mean any service that directly assists an individual with a disability in the selection, acquisition, or use of an assistive technology device. Services shall include:

The evaluation of the needs of an individual with a disability, including a functional evaluation of the individual in the individual’s customary environment;

Purchasing, leasing, or otherwise providing for the acquisition of assistive technology devices by individuals with disabilities;

Selecting, designing, fitting, customizing, adapting, applying, maintaining, repairing, or replacing of assistive technology devices;

Coordinating of resources and services related to assistive technology devices;

Training or technical assistance for an individual with disabilities, or, where appropriate, the family of an individual with disabilities; and

Training or technical assistance for professionals (including individuals providing education and rehabilitation services), employers, or other individuals who provide services to, employ, or are otherwise substantially involved in the major life functions of individuals with disabilities. For the purpose of this chapter, “assistive technology device” means any item, piece of equipment, or product system, whether acquired commercially, off the shelf, modified or customized, that is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional capabilities of individuals with disabilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 417, § 1.

40-14.1-3.
Eligibility for services.

Services available under this chapter may be provided to any person who meets the following criteria:

Has made application therefor to the director of the department of human services in a manner prescribed by the director;

Has a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more major life activities;

Who is or would be enabled by assistive technology devices or services to increase, maintain, or improve a level of functioning in daily living and/or vocational functioning; and

Has not sufficient income or resources, including being available from other sources, to meet the cost of any or all of the services described in §

40-14.1-2

, determination of the insufficiency to be made by the division of community services of the department of human services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 417, § 1.

40-14.1-4.
When services may be provided.

The services as described in §

40-14.1-2

may be provided when: (1) The requirements of §

40-14.1-3

are fulfilled; and (2) Funds are available to provide the services or devices.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 417, § 1.

40-14.1-5.
Appropriations.

There is hereby appropriated to the department of human services funds to implement a technology-related assistance to individuals with disabilities program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 417, § 1.

40-14.1-6.
Acceptance and use of gifts, grants, or fees.

The department of human services is hereby authorized and empowered to accept and use gifts made unconditionally by will or otherwise, grants or fees from third-party payees for services provided for carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 417, § 1.